Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-615
Offenses not cognizable by county court; procedure.

If in the progress of any trial before a county court it shall appear that the defendant ought to be put upon his or her trial for an offense not cognizable before such court, the court shall immediately stop all further proceedings before the court and proceed as in other criminal cases exclusively cognizable before the district court.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 327, p. 798;

R.S.1913, § 8979;

C.S.1922, § 10003;

C.S.1929, § 29-615;

R.S.1943, § 29-615;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 172;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 55.

Entry upon trial for misdemeanor will not bar subsequent prosecution for felony. Larson v. State, 93 Neb. 242, 140 N.W. 176 (1913).